Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2405
Amendments to contracts; subject
to act.

All
amendments to a contract for superintendent services or educational service
unit administrator services shall be subject to the Superintendent Pay Transparency
Act, including, but not limited to, amendments involving salary increases
or benefit changes.

Laws 2014, LB470, § 6.